apertium-eu-en.en.metadix
    <pardef n="bec/ome__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ome</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ome</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omes</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ame</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ome</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oming</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oming</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oming</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/all__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>all</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>all</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alls</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ell</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allen</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alling</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alling</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alling</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="beg/et__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ets</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>otten</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>etting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>etting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>etting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="beg/in__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ins</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inning</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inning</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inning</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="h/old__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>old</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>old</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olds</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eld</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eld</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olding</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olding</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olding</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ben/d__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ds</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ding</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ding</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ding</l>
          <r>d<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cut__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="set"><i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wet"><i>wet</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="become"><i>bec</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="begin"><i>beg</i><par n="beg/in__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="bend"><i>ben</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="unbend"><i>unben</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="bet"><i>bet</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="build"><i>buil</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="rebuild"><i>rebuil</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="come out"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="come"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="come in"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>in</l><r><g><b/>in</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="come back"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="come across"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>across</l><r><g><b/>across</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="come close"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>close</l><r><g><b/>close</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="cut"><i>cut</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="fall down"><i>f</i><par n="f/all__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="fall"><i>f</i><par n="f/all__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="put to bed" a="eleka"><i>put</i><par n="cut__vblex"/><p><l><b/>to<b/>bed</l><r><g><b/>to<b/>bed</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="hold"><i>h</i><par n="h/old__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="hit"><i>hit</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="lend"><i>len</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="let"><i>let</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="overcome"><i>overc</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="put"><i>put</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="send back"><i>sen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="send in"><i>sen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>in</l><r><g><b/>in</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="send"><i>sen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="set"><i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="set up"><i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="shut up"><i>shut</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="put up the price of"><i>put</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>up<b/>the<b/>price<b/>of</l><r><g><b/>up<b/>the<b/>price<b/>of</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="shut"><i>shut</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="shut down"><i>shut</i><par n="cut__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="spend"><i>spen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="split"><i>split</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="upset"><i>upset</i><par n="cut__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="hold responsible"><i>h</i><par n="h/old__vblex" sa="sep" />         <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>       <p>        <l><b/>responsible</l><r><g><b/>responsible</g></r></p></e>
